Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0213

"Bookmaking."

"Bookmaking," as used in this chapter, means accepting bets, upon the outcome of future contingent events, as a business or in which the bettor is charged a fee or "vigorish" for the opportunity to place a bet.

[ 1991 c 261 s 1; 1987 c 4 s 5. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(4).]